src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_SÄÄʹMM
! gradation: yes
! vowel: monophthong
! weak: single
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
!! !!1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE
!! !!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! !!1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!  Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! ** Yaml: __N-saeaemm__
!!
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; !!(1) Sg.Nom: sääʹmm
:%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ;		  !!(1) Sg.Nom: sääʹmm
:%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: sääʹm
:%^PAL%^CC2C PL-NOM ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: sääʹm
:%^VV2V E-STEM_SG-ILL ; !!(3) Sg.Ill: sämma
:%^PAL%^CC2C%>e SG-LOC ; !!(4) Sg.Loc: sääʹmest
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C SG-COM_IN ; !!(5) Sg.Com: saaʹmin
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM_PL-OBL ; !!(5) Sg.Com: saaʹmin
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; !!(6) Ess: sääʹmmen
:%^CC2C E-STEM_N_KUÂLAŽ ; !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: säämaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) säämm-
:%^VV2V%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) säʹm-

LEXICON N_SÄÄʹMM-PL
+N:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; !!(1) Sg.Nom: sääʹmm
+N:%^PAL%^CC2C PL-NOM ; !!(2) Pl.Nom: sääʹm
+N:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C PL-OBL ; !!(5) Sg.Com: saaʹmin
+N:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; !!(6) Ess: sääʹmmen


LEXICON N_ČÄÄʹCC !!= * @CODE@ čääʹcc:čääcc
+N: NMN_ČÄÄʹCC ;
LEXICON NMN_ČÄÄʹCC
! gradation: yes
! vowel: monophthong
! weak: geminate
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
!! !!1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE
!! !!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! !!1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!  Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! ** Yaml: __caacc__
!! * There are several stem types
!! * čääʹcc:čääʹcc
!!
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;                   !!= * @CODE@ (1) čääʹcc
:%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ;                              !!= * @CODE@ (1) čääʹcc
:%^PAL%^KK2GG E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;        !!= * @CODE@ (2) čääʼʒʒ
:%^PAL%^KK2GG PL-NOM ;        !!= * @CODE@ (2) čääʼʒʒ
:%^VV2V E-STEM_SG-ILL ;              !!= * @CODE@ (3) čäcca
:%^PAL%^KK2GG%>e SG-LOC ;                    !!= * @CODE@ (4) čääʼʒʒest
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^KK2GG SG-COM_IN ;          !!= * @CODE@ (5) čaaʼʒʒin
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^KK2GG E-STEM_PL-OBL ;          !!= * @CODE@ (5) čaaʼʒʒin
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ;                              !!= * @CODE@ (6) čääʼccen
:%^KK2GG E-STEM_N_KUÂLAŽ ;    !!= * @CODE@ (9) čääʒʒaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) čääcc-
:%^VV2V%^PAL%^KK2G E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) čäʹʒ-

LEXICON N_ČÄÄʹCC-PL !!= * @CODE@ čääʹʒʒ:čääcc
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;                   !!= * @CODE@ (1) čääʹcc
:%^PAL%^KK2GG PL-NOM ;        !!= * @CODE@ (2) čääʼʒʒ
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^KK2GG E-STEM_PL-OBL ;          !!= * @CODE@ (5) čaaʼʒʒin
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ;                              !!= * @CODE@ (6) čääʼccen


LEXICON N_EEʹǨǨ !!= * @CODE@ eeʹǩǩ:ẹẹkk
+N: NMN_EEʹǨǨ ;
LEXICON NMN_EEʹǨǨ
! gradation: yes
! vowel: monophthong
! weak: geminate
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
!! !!1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE
!! !!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! !!1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!  Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! ** Yaml: __N-eekkj__
!! * There are several stem types
!! * eeʹǩǩ:eeʹǩǩ
!!
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;			!!= * @CODE@ (1) eeʹǩǩ
:%^PAL E-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    			!!= * @CODE@ (1) eeʹǩǩ
:%^PAL%^KK2GG E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	!!= * @CODE@ (2) eeʹjj
:%^PAL%^KK2GG PL-NOM ;	!!= * @CODE@ (2) eeʹjj
:%^VV2V E-STEM_SG-ILL ;     		!!= * @CODE@ (3) ẹkka
:%^PAL%^KK2GG%>e SG-LOC ;	 		!!= * @CODE@ (4) eeʹjjest
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^KK2GG SG-COM_IN ;		!!= * @CODE@ (5) iiʹjjin
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^KK2GG E-STEM_PL-OBL ;		!!= * @CODE@ (5) iiʹjjin
+Use/NG:%^PAL%^KK2GG SG-COM_IN ;		!!= * @CODE@ (5) eeʹjjin
+Use/NG:%^PAL%^KK2GG E-STEM_PL-OBL ;		!!= * @CODE@ (5) eeʹjjin
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; 	   	     		!!= * @CODE@ (6) eeʹǩǩen
:%^KK2GG E-STEM_N_KUÂLAŽ ;	!!= * @CODE@ (9) čääʒʒaž
 E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (10) ẹẹkk-
:%^VV2V%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) eʹǩ-


LEXICON N_PÂÂʹJJ !!= * @CODE@ pââʹjj:pââjj
! vowel: monophthong
+N: NMN_PÂÂʹJJ ;
LEXICON NMN_PÂÂʹJJ
! gradation: yes
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204, 329)
!! !!1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (no vowel shift, all lowered)
!! !!  e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
!! !!1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
!! !!  Palatalized: ELSE
!! !!  Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!! !!1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! !!(8) Pl.Acc: pââʹjid
!! !!(9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: pââjjaž
!! NumContLex="1.113"
!! ** Yaml: __N-paajj__
!! * There are several stem types
!! * pââʹjj:pââʹjj
!!
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
:%^PAL SG-NOM ;			    !!= * @CODE@ (1) pââʹjj
:%^PAL%^CC2C SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;     !!= * @CODE@ (2) pââʹj
:%^VV2V E-STEM_SG-ILL ;    	    !!= * @CODE@ (3) pâjja
:%^PAL%^CC2C%>e SG-LOC ;	 	    !!= * @CODE@ (4) pââʹjest
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C SG-COM_IN ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (5) põõʹjin
:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ;	  	    	    !!= * @CODE@ (6) pââʹjjen
:%^PAL%^CC2C PL-NOM ;     !!= * @CODE@ (2) pââʹj
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C PL-OBL ;
+Der/Dimin:%^V2VV%^CC2C N_KUÂLAŽ ;
+Use/NG:%^J2I%^CC2C SG-GEN ;     !!= * @CODE@ pââi
+Use/NG:%^J2I%^CC2C SG-ACC ;
+Use/NG:%^J2I%^CC2C PL-NOM ;

LEXICON N_KÄʹLBB !!= * @CODE@ käʹlbb:kälbb âʹlǧǧ:âlgg
! vowel: monophthong
!! similar_to: N_PÕRTT
+N: NMN_KÄʹLBB ;
