src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-INCOMING
ceerkavpââʹss:ceerkav#pââss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
eʹbrr:e%^1VOWbrr N_KÄʹLBB ;
häʹlss:hä%^1VOWlss N_KÄʹLBB ;
iiđâšrääʹss:iiđâš#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
innlâʹpss:inn#lâ%^1VOWpss N_KÄʹLBB ;
innsââʹjj:inn#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
išttâmsââʹjj:išttâm#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
išttâmsââʹjj:išttâm#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
jieʹllemmäänpââʹjj:jieʹllemmään#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
jieʹllemtääʹss:jieʹllem#tääss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
jiijjâs-såʹrmm:jiijjâs-så%^1VOWrmm N_KÄʹLBB ;
jiõnstemsââʹjj:jiõnstem#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
jiõŋŋčääʹcc:jiõŋŋ#čääcc N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
jueʹlǧǧlääʹpp-pââʹjj:jueʹlǧǧlääʹpp-#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
jânnamvuʹvddjieʹllemvueʹǩǩlääʹǩǩ:jânnamvuʹvddjieʹllemvueʹǩǩ#lääkk N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
jäʹmǩǩ:jä%^1VOWmkk N_KÄʹLBB ;
jõnnpââʹss:jõnn#pââss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
kaʹlndareeʹǩǩ:kaʹlndar#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
kaʹlndarmäänpââʹjj:kaʹlndarmään#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
korggtääʹss:korgg#tääss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
kueʹllšeeʹllemsââʹjj:kueʹllšeeʹllem#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
kueʹttmäʹrǩǩ:kueʹtt#mä%^1VOWrkk N_KÄʹLBB ;
kuärjjsââʹjj:kuärjj#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
kuäʹrjjsââʹjj:kuäʹrjj#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
kuõbǯǯrääʹss:kuõbǯǯ#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
kâʹptt:kâ%^1VOWptt N_KÄʹLBB ;
käʹlmm:kä%^1VOWlmm N_KÄʹLBB ;
kååraǩkuâtträäʹss:kååraǩkuâtt#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
kååškõkeeʹǩǩ:kååškõk#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
kååʹlezteʹstt:kååʹleztẹ%^1VOWstt N_KÄʹLBB ;
kåʹllrääʹss:kåʹll#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
kåʹrnnčâʹlmm:kåʹrnn#čâ%^1VOWlmm N_KÄʹLBB ;
kõskktäʹlvv:kõskk#tä%^1VOWlvv N_KÄʹLBB ;
laʹsǩǩeempââʹjj:laʹsǩǩeem#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
lokksäʹlbb:lokk#sä%^1VOWlbb N_KÄʹLBB ;
loppeeʹǩǩ:lopp#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
loppââʹǩǩ:lopp#ââkk N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
luõvâspäʹrnn:luõvâs#pä%^1VOWrnn N_KÄʹLBB ;
läinneeʹǩǩ:läinn#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
låhttsââʹjj:låhtt#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
lååʹddâʹlǧǧ:lååʹdd#â%^1VOWlgg N_KÄʹLBB ;
låʹddåårramsââʹjj:låʹddåårram#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
meertiõrvâsvuõttlääʹǩǩ:mẹẹrtiõrvâsvuõtt#lääkk N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
meiʹnnčâʹlmm:meiʹnn#čâ%^1VOWlmm N_KÄʹLBB ;
mieʹcstemsââʹjj:mieʹcstem#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
mineralčääʹcc:mineral#čääcc N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
miârrsäʹltt:miârr#sä%^1VOWltt N_KÄʹLBB ;
muâckačrääʹss:muâckač#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
muõrrluõddamsââʹjj:muõrrluõddam#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
mâŋŋstäʹmnn:mâŋŋ#stä%^1VOWmnn N_KÄʹLBB ;
mäddtääll-lääʹǩǩ:mäddtääll-#lääkk N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
määʹđar-rääʹzz:määʹđar-#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC-PL ;
mååʹđđrääʹss:mååʹđđ#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
neelljõseeʹǩǩ:neelljõs#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
neiʹbbsââʹjj:neiʹbb#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
njeäʹšščääʹcc:njeäʹšˈš#čääcc N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
njäʹrčč:njä%^1VOWrčč N_KÄʹLBB ;
ooumažtuâjjeeʹǩǩ:ooumažtuâjj#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
ouddsââʹjj:oudd#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
peâttar-rääʹss:peâttar-#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
peʹppersäʹrǧǧ:peʹpper#sä%^1VOWrgg N_KÄʹLBB ;
poorrâmrääʹss:poorrâm#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
puuđeeʹǩǩ:puuđ#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
puäʒʒeeʹǩǩ:puäʒʒ#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
puäʒʒhåiddameeʹǩǩ:puäʒʒhåiddam#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
puåtkčõõttâmpââʹjj:puåtkčõõttâm#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
pâjjčääʹcc:pâjj#čääcc N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
pääʹnnhäʹrjj:pääʹnn#hä%^1VOWrjj N_KÄʹLBB ;
pääʹnnsââʹjj:pääʹnn#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
pååđčääʹcc:pååđ#čääcc N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
påʹccrääʹzz:påʹcc#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC-PL ;
põttkåʹlbb:põtt#kå%^1VOWlbb N_KÄʹLBB ;
raajjâmlääʹǩǩ:raajjâm#lääkk N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
ruʹppčääʹcc:ruʹpp#čääcc N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
rââšš:rââšš N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
rääʹss-säʹltt:rääʹss-#sä%^1VOWltt N_KÄʹLBB ;
serddmeäʹttemsââʹjj:serdd#meäʹttem#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
seʹrddemvââʹǩǩ:seʹrddem#vââkk N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
smaavvâʹbrr:smaavv#â%^1VOWbrr N_KÄʹLBB ;
spesiaal-lääʹǩǩ:spesiaal-#lääkk N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
sueiʹnntåʹpǩǩ:sueiʹnntå%^1VOWpkk N_KÄʹLBB ;
suõrmmrääʹzz:suõrmm#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC-PL ;
sähssčääʹcc:sähss#čääcc N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
säähharčâʹlmm:säähhar#čâ%^1VOWlmm N_KÄʹLBB ;
sääldatvââʹǩǩ:sääldat#vââkk N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
säʹppleerääʹzz:säʹpplee#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC-PL ;
sǩeʹlŋŋčâʹlmm:sǩeʹlŋŋ#čâ%^1VOWlmm N_KÄʹLBB ;
tiõrvvâzsuõjjeemlääʹǩǩ:tiõrvvâzsuõjjeem#lääkk N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
tueʹleslâʹpss:tueʹles#lâ%^1VOWpss N_KÄʹLBB ;
tueʹlespââʹjj:tueʹles#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
tuneeʹǩǩ:tun#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
tuåimmjempââʹjj:tuåimmjem#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
tuõlddikäivvčääʹcc:tuõlddikäivv#čääcc N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
tänâʹlmm:tän#â%^1VOWlmm N_KÄʹLBB ;
täʹsnnčâʹlmm:täʹsnn#čâ%^1VOWlmm N_KÄʹLBB ;
uʹrvvpââʹjj:uʹrvv#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
vaaldšemlääʹǩǩ:vaaldšem#lääkk N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
vieʹnccpåʹrdd:vieʹncc#på%^1VOWrdd N_KÄʹLBB ;
vueiʹvvrõščääʹcc:vueiʹvvrõš#čääcc N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
vueʹlǧǧemsââʹjj:vueʹlǧǧem#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
vueʹrddempââʹjj:vueʹrddem#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
vuâđđrääʹzz:vuâđđ#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC-PL ;
vuâđđškooul-lääʹǩǩ:vuâđđškooul-#lääkk N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
vuâŋŋampââʹjj:vuâŋŋam#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
vuäʹmmeeʹǩǩ:vuäʹmm#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
vuõddâsčâʹlmm:vuõddâs#čâ%^1VOWlmm N_KÄʹLBB ;
vääʹnneeʹǩǩ:vääʹnn#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
väʹlddišttâmsââʹjj:väʹlddišttâm#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
väʹlmm:vä%^1VOWlmm N_KÄʹLBB ;
võskâseeʹǩǩ:võskâs#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
ääʹššlažlääʹǩǩ:ääʹššlaž#lääkk N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
ååʹrallpiiđlääʹǩǩ:ååʹrallpiiđ#lääkk N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
åʹtǩǩ:å%^1VOWtkk N_KÄʹLBB ;
čeerääʹzz:čee#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC-PL ;
čiõkksââʹjj:čiõkk#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
čuuʹđčuõppâmsââʹjj:čuuʹđčuõppâm#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
čâustõkpââʹjj:čâustõk#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
čâʹcǩǩ:čâ%^1VOWckk N_KÄʹLBB ;
čääʹccrääʹss:čääʹcc#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
čõhččlookkâmpââʹjj:čõhččlookkâm#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
čõǩǩeem-mäʹtǩǩ:čõǩǩeem-#mä%^1VOWtkk N_KÄʹLBB ;
šõddâmpââʹjj:šõddâm#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
ǩeâllrääʹzz:ǩeâlˈl#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC-PL ;
ǩeäzzõkeeʹǩǩ:ǩeäzzõk#ẹẹkk N_EEʹǨǨ ;
ǩeʹttemsââʹjj:ǩeʹttem#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
ǩiiddtäʹsnn:ǩiidd#tä%^1VOWsnn N_KÄʹLBB ;
ǩiârdrääʹss:ǩiârd#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC ;
ǩiõttpââʹjj:ǩiõtt#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
ǩiõttsââʹjj:ǩiõtt#sââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
ǩiõǥǥnjuõllrääʹzz:ǩiõǥǥ#njuõll#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC-PL ;
ǩiđđlookkâmpââʹjj:ǩiđđlookkâm#pââjj N_PÂÂʹJJ ;
ǩiđđčâʹlmmrääʹzz:ǩiđđ#čâʹlmm#rääss N_ČÄÄʹCC-PL ;
